Wyoming, session 2025, HB0256.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-11-701(a)(intro), (b)(i), (ii),
(c)(intro), (i) and by creating a new subsection (d) and
40-31-105(e) are amended to read:

ARTICLE 7
SELECT COMMITTEE ON BLOCKCHAIN AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES

HB0256

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0686
28-11-701. Appointment of members; powers and duties;
executive branch liaisons.

(a) Not later than March 15 following each general
election, a select committee on blockchain, financial
technology and digital innovation technology and emerging
technologies shall be appointed subject to the following:

(b) The select committee shall:

(i) Develop knowledge and expertise among its
members regarding issues pertaining to blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies;

(ii) Subject to subsection (e) of this section,
develop and introduce legislation as necessary to promote
blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation in
Wyoming unless the legislation relates to Title 13 of the
Wyoming statues, in which case the legislation shall be
recommended to the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee for consideration Wyoming's
continued leadership in the digital economy by:
HB0256

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0686

(A) Reducing impediments to economic
opportunities for technology and technology companies
within the state;

(B) Developing policies that encourage
technology companies to locate and remain in the state;

(C) Promoting further development of
digital commercial activity in the state.

(c) Not later than March 15 following each general
election, the governor shall appoint three (3) persons to
serve as liaisons to the select committee on blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies. The governor may, in a manner
consistent with W.S. 9-1-202, remove any liaison to the
select committee. The liaisons shall:

(i) Aid, assist and advise the select committee
on issues pertaining to blockchain, financial technology
and digital innovation technology and emerging
technologies;
HB0256

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0686

(d) Any legislation that relates to title 13 of the
Wyoming statutes shall not be introduced by the select
committee without the consent of the chairmen of the joint
minerals, business and economic development interim
committee. If consent for introduction by the select
committee is not obtained, the legislation may be
recommended to the joint minerals, business and economic
development committee for consideration.

40-31-105. Powers of the commission.

(e) Before publicly issuing any fully reserved
Wyoming stable tokens, the director shall provide a
comprehensive report to the select committee on blockchain,
financial technology and digital innovation technology and
emerging technologies and the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee on all actions taken
under this act.

Section 2. For all purposes the select committee on
blockchain and emerging technologies, as renamed in this
act, is a continuation of the select committee on
HB0256

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0686
blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation
technology.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0256